Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-4612
District court; enforcement.

Any district court of this state in which any action is instituted in the case of any willful or negligent refusal to obey a subpoena or order of the commission issued pursuant to section 71-4611, may issue an order requiring compliance therewith. Any person who fails to obey such order of the court shall be guilty of contempt of court and may be punished by such court accordingly.

Laws 1975, LB 300, § 11;

Laws 1998, LB 1073, § 136.